public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/test.aff
FLAG long
# vèrbi -ér inregolari ((stra)saver, (re)aver, (re)gaver)
# themeT1 + r/a0a1a2j0E0E1E2
SFX j0 Y 357
SFX j0 0 imo/E0E1E2J0 aver
SFX j0 0 me/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 0 ne/K0 o
SFX j0 0 í/N0 aver
SFX j0 0 íe/F0F1F2J0 aver
SFX j0 0 ímoe/K0 aver
SFX j0 0 íu/O0 aver
SFX j0 aver ebi/F0F1F2L0 aver
SFX j0 aver ebia/E0E1E2 aver
SFX j0 aver ebie/E0E1E2F0F1F2I0J0 aver
SFX j0 aver ebiede/N0 aver
SFX j0 aver ebiege/N0 aver
SFX j0 aver ebiemo/E0E1E2J0 aver
SFX j0 aver ebien/J0 aver
SFX j0 aver ebiene/K0 aver
SFX j0 aver ebion/E0E1E2J0 aver
SFX j0 aver ebione/K0 aver
SFX j0 aver ebionme/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 aver ebiè/J0 aver
SFX j0 aver ebiène/K0 aver
SFX j0 aver ebié/N0 aver
SFX j0 aver ebiémoe/K0 aver
SFX j0 aver ebiéu/O0 aver
SFX j0 aver ebiónmene/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 aver elo/B0 gaver
SFX j0 aver emo/J0 gaver
SFX j0 aver ene/K0 gaver
SFX j0 aver epi/F0F1F2L0 aver
SFX j0 aver epia/E0E1E2 aver
SFX j0 aver epie/E0E1E2F0F1F2I0J0 aver
SFX j0 aver epiede/N0 aver
SFX j0 aver epiege/N0 aver
SFX j0 aver epiemo/E0E1E2J0 aver
SFX j0 aver epien/J0 aver
SFX j0 aver epiene/K0 aver
SFX j0 aver epion/E0E1E2J0 aver
SFX j0 aver epione/K0 aver
SFX j0 aver epionme/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 aver epiè/J0 aver
SFX j0 aver epiène/K0 aver
SFX j0 aver epié/N0 aver
SFX j0 aver epiémoe/K0 aver
SFX j0 aver epiéu/O0 aver
SFX j0 aver epiónmene/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 aver ese/I0T0 gaver
SFX j0 aver eva/F0F1F2J0N0 gaver
SFX j0 aver eve/J0 gaver
SFX j0 aver evi/J0L0N0 gaver
SFX j0 aver evo/J0 gaver
SFX j0 aver eƚo/B0 gaver
SFX j0 aver ojo saver
SFX j0 aver oɉo saver
SFX j0 aver à/E0E1E2J0L0 aver
SFX j0 aver àbielo/B0 aver
SFX j0 aver àbiene/K0 aver
SFX j0 aver àbieƚo/B0 aver
SFX j0 aver àbime/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 aver àbimene/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 aver àbionme/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 aver àbitu/M0 aver
SFX j0 aver àene/K0 aver
SFX j0 aver àlo/B0 aver
SFX j0 aver àmene/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 aver àpielo/B0 aver
SFX j0 aver àpiene/K0 aver
SFX j0 aver àpieƚo/B0 aver
SFX j0 aver àpime/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 aver àpimene/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 aver àpionme/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 aver àpitu/M0 aver
SFX j0 aver àƚo/B0 aver
SFX j0 aver èbielo/B0 aver
SFX j0 aver èbiene/K0 aver
SFX j0 aver èbieƚo/B0 aver
SFX j0 aver èpielo/B0 aver
SFX j0 aver èpiene/K0 aver
SFX j0 aver èpieƚo/B0 aver
SFX j0 aver é/F0F1F2N0 gaver
SFX j0 aver éane/K0 gaver
SFX j0 aver éau/O0 gaver
SFX j0 aver ébiene/K0 aver
SFX j0 aver ébime/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 aver ébimene/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 aver ébitu/M0 aver
SFX j0 aver éelo/B0 gaver
SFX j0 aver éene/K0 gaver
SFX j0 aver éeƚo/B0 gaver
SFX j0 aver éimo/J0 gaver
SFX j0 aver éimoe/K0 gaver
SFX j0 aver éitu/M0 gaver
SFX j0 aver émo/E0E1E2J0 gaver
SFX j0 aver émoe/K0 gaver
SFX j0 aver émome/G0G1G2 gaver
SFX j0 aver émomene/G0G1G2 gaver
SFX j0 aver éone/K0 gaver
SFX j0 aver épiene/K0 aver
SFX j0 aver épime/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 aver épimene/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 aver épitu/M0 aver
SFX j0 aver érmene/G0G1G2 gaver
SFX j0 aver ésimo gaver
SFX j0 aver étu/M0 gaver
SFX j0 aver éu/O0 gaver
SFX j0 aver évane/K0 gaver
SFX j0 aver évau/O0 gaver
SFX j0 aver évelo/B0 gaver
SFX j0 aver évene/K0 gaver
SFX j0 aver éveƚo/B0 gaver
SFX j0 aver évimo/J0 gaver
SFX j0 aver évimoe/K0 gaver
SFX j0 aver évitu/M0 gaver
SFX j0 aver évone/K0 gaver
SFX j0 aver í/F0F1F2N0 gaver
SFX j0 aver ímoe/K0 gaver
SFX j0 aver ò/J0 aver
SFX j0 aver òe/K0 aver
SFX j0 aver òjo saver
SFX j0 aver òɉo saver
SFX j0 er aralo/B0 aver
SFX j0 er arane/K0 aver
SFX j0 er aratu/M0 aver
SFX j0 er arave/F0F1F2Q1Q2 aver
SFX j0 er araƚo/B0 aver
SFX j0 er aremo/E0E1E2J0 aver
SFX j0 er aren/J0 aver
SFX j0 er arene/K0 aver
SFX j0 er arense aver
SFX j0 er aresi/N0 aver
SFX j0 er aresiu/O0 aver
SFX j0 er arimo/J0 aver
SFX j0 er arion/J0 aver
SFX j0 er arione/K0 aver
SFX j0 er arionse aver
SFX j0 er arisen/J0 aver
SFX j0 er arisene/K0 aver
SFX j0 er arisense aver
SFX j0 er arisi/N0 aver
SFX j0 er arision/J0 aver
SFX j0 er arisione/K0 aver
SFX j0 er arisionse aver
SFX j0 er arisiu/O0 aver
SFX j0 er arisié/N0 aver
SFX j0 er arisiéu/O0 aver
SFX j0 er arison/J0 aver
SFX j0 er arisone/K0 aver
SFX j0 er arisonse aver
SFX j0 er arié/N0 aver
SFX j0 er ariéu/O0 aver
SFX j0 er aron/J0 aver
SFX j0 er arone/K0 aver
SFX j0 er aronse aver
SFX j0 er arà/F0F1F2J0L0 aver
SFX j0 er aràe/F0F1F2 aver
SFX j0 er aràvelo/B0 aver
SFX j0 er aràvene/K0 aver
SFX j0 er aràveƚo/B0 aver
SFX j0 er arè/J0 aver
SFX j0 er arène/K0 aver
SFX j0 er aré/N0 aver
SFX j0 er arémoe/K0 aver
SFX j0 er arémome/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 er arémomene/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 er arésimo/J0 aver
SFX j0 er arésimoe/K0 aver
SFX j0 er arésitu/M0 aver
SFX j0 er aréu/O0 aver
SFX j0 er arí/N0 aver
SFX j0 er aría/F0F1F2J0L0 aver
SFX j0 er aríane/K0 aver
SFX j0 er aríatu/M0 aver
SFX j0 er aríe/F0F1F2J0 aver
SFX j0 er aríelo/B0 aver
SFX j0 er aríene/K0 aver
SFX j0 er aríeƚo/B0 aver
SFX j0 er arímoe/K0 aver
SFX j0 er arísitu/M0 aver
SFX j0 er aríu/O0 aver
SFX j0 er arò/J0 aver
SFX j0 er aròe/K0 aver
SFX j0 er iede/N0 aver
SFX j0 er iege/N0 aver
SFX j0 er ime/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 er imo/E0E1E2J0 aver
SFX j0 er ion/E0E1E2J0 aver
SFX j0 er ione/K0 aver
SFX j0 er ionme/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 er isen/J0 aver
SFX j0 er isene/K0 aver
SFX j0 er isense aver
SFX j0 er isiede/N0 aver
SFX j0 er isiege/N0 aver
SFX j0 er ision/J0 aver
SFX j0 er isione/K0 aver
SFX j0 er isionse aver
SFX j0 er isié/N0 aver
SFX j0 er ison/J0 aver
SFX j0 er isone/K0 aver
SFX j0 er isonse aver
SFX j0 er iven/J0 aver
SFX j0 er ivene/K0 aver
SFX j0 er ivense aver
SFX j0 er ivion/J0 aver
SFX j0 er ivione/K0 aver
SFX j0 er ivionse aver
SFX j0 er ivié/N0 aver
SFX j0 er iviéu/O0 aver
SFX j0 er ivon/J0 aver
SFX j0 er ivone/K0 aver
SFX j0 er ivonse aver
SFX j0 er ié/N0 aver
SFX j0 er iéu/O0 aver
SFX j0 er iónmene/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 er on/E0E1E2J0 aver
SFX j0 er one/K0 aver
SFX j0 er onme/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 er udo/B0 aver
SFX j0 er é/F0F1F2N0 aver
SFX j0 er éa/F0F1F2J0N0 aver
SFX j0 er éane/K0 aver
SFX j0 er éau/O0 aver
SFX j0 er ée/J0 aver
SFX j0 er éelo/B0 aver
SFX j0 er éene/K0 aver
SFX j0 er éeƚo/B0 aver
SFX j0 er éi/J0L0N0 aver
SFX j0 er éimo/J0 aver
SFX j0 er éimoe/K0 aver
SFX j0 er éitu/M0 aver
SFX j0 er émene/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 er émo/E0E1E2J0 aver
SFX j0 er émoe/K0 aver
SFX j0 er émome/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 er émomene/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 er éndome/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 er éndomene/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 er éntome/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 er éntomene/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 er éo/J0 aver
SFX j0 er éone/K0 aver
SFX j0 er érmene/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 er ésimo aver
SFX j0 er étu/M0 aver
SFX j0 er éu/O0 aver
SFX j0 er évane/K0 aver
SFX j0 er évau/O0 aver
SFX j0 er évelo/B0 aver
SFX j0 er évene/K0 aver
SFX j0 er éveƚo/B0 aver
SFX j0 er évimo/J0 aver
SFX j0 er évimoe/K0 aver
SFX j0 er évitu/M0 aver
SFX j0 er évone/K0 aver
SFX j0 er í/F0F1F2N0 aver
SFX j0 er ímene/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 er ímoe/K0 aver
SFX j0 er íu/O0 aver
SFX j0 er ónmene/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 er ú/B0 aver
SFX j0 o e/E0E1E2F0F1F2J0 o
SFX j0 r 0/K0 aver
SFX j0 r de aver
SFX j0 r ge aver
SFX j0 r lo/B0 aver
SFX j0 r me/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 r mo/J0 aver
SFX j0 r n/J0 aver
SFX j0 r ne/K0 aver
SFX j0 r nse aver
SFX j0 r nte/T0I0 aver
SFX j0 r nto aver
SFX j0 r se/I0T0 aver
SFX j0 r va/F0F1F2J0N0 aver
SFX j0 r ve/J0 aver
SFX j0 r vi/J0L0N0 aver
SFX j0 r vo/J0 aver
SFX j0 r ƚo/B0 aver
SFX j0 ver bi/F0F1F2L0 aver
SFX j0 ver bia/E0E1E2 aver
SFX j0 ver biando/E0E1E2 ver
SFX j0 ver bianto/E0E1E2 ver
SFX j0 ver bie/E0E1E2F0F1F2I0J0 aver
SFX j0 ver biede/N0 aver
SFX j0 ver biege/N0 aver
SFX j0 ver biemo/E0E1E2J0 aver
SFX j0 ver bien/J0 aver
SFX j0 ver biene/K0 aver
SFX j0 ver bion/E0E1E2J0 aver
SFX j0 ver bione/K0 aver
SFX j0 ver biàndome/G0G1G2 ver
SFX j0 ver biàndomene/G0G1G2 ver
SFX j0 ver biè/J0 aver
SFX j0 ver biène/K0 aver
SFX j0 ver bié/N0 aver
SFX j0 ver biémoe/K0 aver
SFX j0 ver biéu/O0 aver
SFX j0 ver budo/B0 aver
SFX j0 ver bú/B0 aver
SFX j0 ver e/F0F1F2J0 aver
SFX j0 ver lo/B0 aver
SFX j0 ver me/G0G1G2 aver
SFX j0 ver ne/K0 aver
SFX j0 ver pi/F0F1F2L0 aver
SFX j0 ver pia/E0E1E2 aver
SFX j0 ver pie/E0E1E2F0F1F2I0J0 aver
SFX j0 ver piede/N0 aver
SFX j0 ver piege/N0 aver
