public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/test.dic
ʼéo/j0J0
ʼvéo/j0J0
ào/j0J0.0
aver/a0a1a2j0E0E1E2.0
gaver/a0a1a2j0E0E1E2.0
gào/j0J0.0
saver/a0a1a2j0E0E1E2=0.0
sào/j0J0=0.0
saer/a0a1a2j0E0E1E2=0.0
